Illinois, session 104th, SB2976.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Treasurer Act is amended by adding 5Section 11.5 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 505/11.5 new)7    Sec. 11.5. Recovery for breach of presentment warranties. 8The Treasurer may bring a claim against a warrantor of a draft 9for breach of a presentment warranty to recover State funds in 10accordance with Sections 3-417 and 4-208 of the Uniform 11Commercial Code. However, a claim brought by the Treasurer 12under those Sections is not subject to the limitations 13provided for in subsection (e) of Section 3-417 or subsection 14(e) of Section 4-208 of the Uniform Commercial Code. The 15changes made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 16Assembly are declaratory of existing law. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.